Washington statutes.
RCW 4.64.110

Transcript of district court docket.

A transcript of the district court docket shall contain an exact copy of the district court judgment from the docket.

[ 1987 c 202 s 118; 1957 c 7 s 9. Prior: 1929 c 60 s 3, part; 1893 c 42 s 4; RRS s 452.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.